Utah statutes.
54-18-305.   Appeal of high voltage power line route.

This chapter does not affect a public utility's or local government's right to appeal a high voltage power line route to the Utility Facility Review Board in accordance with the provisions of Chapter 14, Utility Facility Review Board Act.



Amended by Chapter 89, 2013 General Session

